Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201817-910
Joint power plant; construction; approval of electors.

Two or more cities of the second class or villages may jointly erect a power plant, electric or other light works as provided in section 17-906 which shall serve such respective cities or villages, and such power plant, electric or other light works may be owned and operated jointly by such respective cities or villages. Such cities or villages shall have the same rights and privileges as are in sections 17-906 to 17-909 granted to any single city or village. Before such cities or villages shall make any contract with any person or corporation relating in any manner whatever to the erection of such proposed power plant, electric or other light works, the question as to whether such jointly owned and operated power plant, electric or other light works shall be erected shall first be duly submitted to the electors of the respective cities or villages contemplating the erection of such power plant, electric or other light works and be approved by a sixty percent majority of the voters in each of such cities or villages in the manner provided in section 17-908.

Laws 1921, c. 192, § 2, p. 712;

C.S.1922, § 4395;

C.S.1929, § 17-602;

R.S.1943, § 17-910;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 246.

Electric or other light works may be constructed by a municipality outside its corporate limits. Interstate Power Co. v. City of Ainsworth, 125 Neb. 419, 250 N.W. 649 (1933).